Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-304
Lien; enforcement by action; time.

The holder of such lien shall within two years of the filing of such lien institute an action to foreclose and enforce the lien in the manner now provided by law for the foreclosure of a construction lien or institute an action in attachment or replevin, setting forth the lienholder's interest and right to possession thereto, in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where such oil field equipment has been delivered, or in any county where it can be located.

Laws 1951, c. 185, § 4, p. 691;

Laws 1959, c. 260, § 2, p. 898.